Maryland, session 2025, HB0041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
4–102.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a petition for the
formation of a new political party, or any additional signatures to a petition, may be filed
at any time.
(2) A petition for the formation of a new political party, or any additional
signatures to a petition, may be filed:
(i) in the year of an election at which the President is elected except:
1. during the period of time that registration is closed before
and after a primary election in accordance with § 3–302(a) of this article; and
2. after the first Monday in [August] JULY until registration
reopens after the general election in accordance with § 3–302(a) of this article;
(ii) in the year of an election at which the Governor is elected, except
after the first Monday in [August] JULY until registration reopens after the general
election in accordance with § 3–302(a) of this article; or
– 1 –

Ch. 282 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) when a special primary election and a special election are
proclaimed by the Governor in accordance with § 8–710 of this article except:
1. after the fifth Monday before the special primary election
through the tenth day following the special primary election; and
2. after the fifth Monday before the special election through
the fifteenth day following the special election.
(3) IF AN OFFICIAL DETERMINATION HAS BEEN MADE THAT A
PETITION FOR THE FORMATION OF A NEW POLITICAL PARTY FAILS TO MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION OR TITLE 6 OF THIS ARTICLE,
THE SIGNATURES SUBMITTED WITH THE PETITION MAY NOT BE RESUBMITTED WITH
A SUBSEQUENT PETITION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –